Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB589.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1512.1 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1512.1. Physical education.--(a) The board of school directors in every school district shall establish a curriculum aligned with Pennsylvania academic standards on health, safety and physical education that pursuant to 22 Pa. Code § 4.27 (relating to physical education and athletics), requires pupils enrolled in the school district to participate in physical education.(b) Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year and in each school year thereafter, a board of school directors may permit 1234567891011121314151617181920 students to satisfy physical education requirements by participating in interscholastic athletics.(c) A board of school directors that intends to exercise the power under subsection (b) must develop a policy or revise an existing policy to permit students to satisfy physical education requirements by participating in interscholastic athletics.(d) Utilization of interscholastic athletics to satisfy physical education requirements may satisfy components of the academic standards for health, safety and physical education under 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4 Appen. D (relating to Academic Standards for the Arts and Humanities and Health, Safety and Physical Education and Family and Consumer Sciences) but may not serve as a complete waiver or exemption from the health, safety and physical education academic standards . (e) As used in this section, "interscholastic athletics" means athletic contests or competitions conducted between or among school entities situated in a school district.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0589PN0596 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718